Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4196.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SOCIAL DISTRICT LICENSE; CITY OF EDINA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Social district; consumption allowed. new text end new text begin (a) The city of Edina may issue a social district license to any holder of an on-sale license whose on-sale premises is contiguous with the premises of the social district designated in subdivision 2. The license authorizes consumption, but not sales or service, of alcoholic beverages sold by the on-sale licensee within the social district. new text end new text begin (b) In addition to the licenses that may be issued to on-sale licensees in paragraph (a), a city may issue a social district license to a municipal liquor store authorized by the city for on-sale of intoxicating liquor and to the holder of a caterer's permit, for sales or service and consumption, within the boundaries of the social district designated in subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Designation of social district. new text end new text begin (a) Before issuing the license in subdivision 1, the city must designate and describe the premises of the social district. The district may not include any area under the ownership or control of a person that objects to the extension of the social district to that area. new text end new text begin (b) The designation must include the specific premises where consumption of alcoholic beverages is allowed and also include the proposed hours and days in which consumption of alcoholic beverages is allowed in the social district. The city must adopt the designation by ordinance before issuing the license in subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (c) A city may designate or modify a social district's premises to include the premises of a social district located in another city, provided that the premises for each social district abut and each city authorizes the combined district by ordinance. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Boundaries clearly defined. new text end new text begin The social district must be clearly defined with signs posted in a conspicuous location indicating the area included in the social district and the days and hours during which alcoholic beverages may be consumed in the district. In addition, signs must include: new text end new text begin (1) the local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the area comprising the social district; and new text end new text begin (2) a clear statement that an alcoholic beverage purchased for consumption in the social district shall: new text end new text begin (i) only be consumed in the social district or in a social district located in another city as allowed in subdivision 2, paragraph (c); and new text end new text begin (ii) be disposed of before the person in possession of the alcoholic beverage exits the social district unless the person is reentering the licensed premises where the alcoholic beverage was purchased. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Management and maintenance. new text end new text begin The city must establish management and maintenance plans for the social district and post these plans, along with a rendering of the boundaries of the social district and days and hours during which alcoholic beverages may be consumed in the district, on the website for the city. The social district must be maintained in a manner that protects the health and safety of the general public. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Requirements for on-sale licensees. new text end new text begin An on-sale licensee holding a social district license may only sell and serve alcoholic beverages on the premises specified in the licensee's on-sale license. The licensee must not allow a person to enter or reenter its on-sale licensed premises with an alcoholic beverage not sold by the on-sale licensee. Sales for consumption in the social district must meet the following container requirements: new text end new text begin (1) the container clearly identifies the on-sale licensee from which the alcoholic beverage was purchased; new text end new text begin (2) the container clearly displays a logo or some other mark that is unique to the social district in which it will be consumed; new text end new text begin (3) the container is not comprised of glass; new text end new text begin (4) the container displays, in no less than 12-point font, the statement, "Drink Responsibly - Be 21."; and new text end new text begin (5) the container shall not hold more than 16 fluid ounces. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Additional social district requirements. new text end new text begin The possession and consumption of an alcoholic beverage in a social district is subject to all of the following requirements: new text end new text begin (1) only alcoholic beverages purchased from an on sale-licensee holding a social district license located in or contiguous to the social district may be possessed and consumed in the district; new text end new text begin (2) alcoholic beverages shall only be in containers meeting the requirements set forth in subdivision 5; new text end new text begin (3) alcoholic beverages shall only be possessed and consumed during the days and hours set by the city as specified in subdivision 2; and new text end new text begin (4) a person shall dispose of any alcoholic beverage in the person's possession before exiting the social district unless the person is reentering the on-sale licensed premises where the alcoholic beverage was purchased. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective upon approval by the Edina City Council and compliance with Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021. new text end